Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.180

Application of Consumer Protection Act and False Advertising Act.

Acts and practices in the course of trade in the promoting, advertising, selling, fitting, and dispensing of hearing instruments shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW (Consumer Protection Act) and RCW 9.04.050 (False Advertising Act) and any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute violation of RCW 19.86.020.

[ 1996 c 200 s 24; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 18.]